New York, session 2025-2026, S3546.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 28-b of the banking law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 4-a to read as follows: 3 4-a. A minority depository institution as defined by section 308 of 4 the federal Financial Institution Reform, Recovery, and Enforcement Act 5 of 1989, to which the Community Reinvestment Act of 1977, United States 6 P.L. 95-128, applies, shall be exempt from the filing requirements set 7 forth in subdivision one of this section for a period of ten years from 8 the date such minority depository institution commences doing business. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08085-01-5